Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB570.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 118A.020 is amended to read as follows:
Justices of the Supreme Court shall be elected from the Supreme Court districts
established by KRS Chapter 21A by the voters of the Commonwealth on a statewide
basis.
Section 2. This Act takes effect January 2, 2029.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/5/2026 11:13 AM Jacketed